Georgia statutes. TITLE 47 Retirement and Pensions
Article 3 Membership in and Contributions to the Fund

47-16-40.
Application for membership in the fund; contents of application; claim for credit for prior service.

In order to become a member of the Sheriffs’ Retirement Fund of Georgia, an applicant must meet the following requirements:

He must be a duly qualified and commissioned sheriff of a county of the State of Georgia, serving as sheriff of the superior court of that county at the time he files his application;

He must file his application for membership with the secretary-treasurer within one year from the date he begins service as a sheriff or within the time limits set forth in Code Section 47-16-41;

He must set out in the application for membership his correct date of birth;

He must list in his application for membership all periods of prior service, including credit under Code Section 47-16-80 for services in the armed forces of the United States or as a peace officer, for which service he intends to ask credit as basis for his future retirement, or shall forever be barred from claiming credit for services not so listed;

The member must tender with the application, within 12 months from the date of that application, or at such other time as the board may provide, a sum equal to the total of $37.50 per month for credit claimed by the member under paragraph (4) of this Code section for past service from and including January 1, 1961, to the date of application; or if such amount is not paid by the due date, the member shall be conclusively deemed to have waived his or her claim or right for credit for such period of time; or

He must also furnish to the board such other information and proof of pertinent facts set out in the application for membership or relative to it as may be required by the board; and failure to do so shall constitute grounds for denial of the application for membership by the board.

History.

Ga. L. 1963, p. 630, § 11; Ga. L. 1968, p. 1203, § 6; Ga. L. 1969, p. 586, § 1; Ga. L. 1983, p. 1185, § 2; Ga. L. 1990, p. 315, § 1; Ga. L. 1994, p. 325, § 1.

47-16-41.
Delayed application for membership in the fund; credit for prior service as a sheriff, member of the armed forces of the United States, or peace officer.

Any duly qualified and commissioned sheriff who would be eligible to become a member but for the provisions of paragraph (2) of Code Section 47-16-40 shall be permitted to become a member if he files his application with the secretary-treasurer of the board between June 1, 1969, and June 30, 1969, or within 30 days following the beginning of such sheriff’s new elective or appointive term.

Any sheriff who has served as a sheriff of a county of this state at any time since 1960 and who has not been a member of the fund may become a member by means of either of the following procedures:

He may claim credit for all prior service as a sheriff by tendering payment of all amounts which he would have paid had he been a member of the fund, together with interest on such amounts at 8 percent per annum and such reasonable penalty as may be imposed by the board; or

He may waive credit for prior service as a sheriff and be credited for service beginning on the first day of the elective or appointive term in which his application is submitted to and accepted by the board.

In no event shall any sheriff who joins the fund under this subsection or subsection (a) of this Code section be permitted to claim credit for prior service as a peace officer, except sheriff, or member of any of the armed forces of the United States under Code Section 47-16-80.

Any currently serving sheriff who was previously a member of the fund but who subsequently ceased to be a sheriff and withdrew from the fund may, upon again becoming a sheriff, become a member of the fund by submitting an application to the secretary-treasurer of the board between July 1, 1994, and December 31, 1994. After December 31, 1994, any person who was previously a member of the fund and subsequently ceased to be a sheriff and withdrew from the fund may become a member of the fund by submitting an application to the secretary-treasurer of the board within one year from the date he or she again becomes a sheriff. No sheriff who joins the fund pursuant to this subsection shall be entitled to claim credit for prior service as a sheriff, a peace officer, or a member of the armed services.

History.

Ga. L. 1969, p. 586, § 3; Ga. L. 1994, p. 328, § 1; Ga. L. 1995, p. 27, § 1; Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 64/SB 436.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, substituted “, except sheriff,” for “(except sheriff)” in the ending undesignated paragraph of subsection (b).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “The intent of this Act is to repeal obsolete and inoperative provisions and to make certain stylistic corrections in Title 47 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated. Nothing in this Act shall deny, abridge, increase, renew, revive, or on any way affect any right, benefit, option, credit, or election to which any person was entitled pursuant to such title on June 30, 2010, and the board of trustees of each public retirement system is authorized and directed to provide by regulation for the continuation of any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election not otherwise covered in this Act; provided, however, that any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election shall be subject to the statutory provisions in effect on June 30, 2010.”

Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 67, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “In the event of an irreconcilable conflict between a provision of Sections 62 through 64 of this Act and a provision of another Act enacted at the 2010 regular session of the General Assembly, the provision of such other Act shall control over this Act to the extent of the conflict.”

47-16-42.
Effect of membership or participation in other retirement programs on membership and benefits under this chapter.

Membership in this retirement fund shall not be affected by membership or participation in any other fund or retirement system. There shall be no reduction in benefits predicated solely upon eligibility of the member to benefits from another independent source of retirement or pension. The benefits under this chapter are to be in addition to any other retirement benefits. There shall be no reduction in benefits otherwise payable to any member under any other state or quasi-state sponsored or sanctioned fund or retirement system because of membership and participation in this retirement fund.

History.

Ga. L. 1963, p. 630, § 23; Ga. L. 1974, p. 1194, § 2.

47-16-43.
Requirements for continued active membership in the fund.

In order to retain active membership in the fund, each member must:

Continue serving as a sheriff;

Pay to the secretary-treasurer membership dues of $45.00 per month. Such payment shall be due on or before the tenth day of the following month until the member has made such payments for a total of 30 years; and

Comply with all other mandatory provisions of this chapter and all rules and regulations promulgated by the board.

History.

Ga. L. 1963, p. 630, § 13; Ga. L. 1968, p. 1203, § 8; Ga. L. 1981, p. 1889, § 1; Ga. L. 1983, p. 1185, § 3; Ga. L. 1988, p. 1566, § 1; Ga. L. 1990, p. 315, § 2; Ga. L. 1994, p. 325, § 2; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1167, § 1.

47-16-44.
Removal from active membership roll; requirements for reinstatement to active membership; claim for credit for service during period of inactive membership.

If a member fails to comply with the requirements of Code Section 47-16-43 for any reason, the board shall remove him from the active membership roll and place him on the inactive or dormant roll. During such time as he may be on the inactive or dormant roll, he shall receive no credit for service as a basis for his retirement unless and until he is reinstated as an active member.

If the removal was occasioned by noncompliance with paragraph (1) of Code Section 47-16-43, the member may be reinstated to the active membership roll upon again becoming a sheriff and filing his application for reinstatement within 12 months from the date he again becomes a sheriff. In his application for reinstatement, he may also list and claim credit for any time he may have served in the armed forces of the United States or as a peace officer during such inactive or dormant membership period, provided that such claim otherwise meets the requirements and limitations of Code Section 47-16-80. The time of filing this application and claim for credit and the payment of dues in order to receive credit for services performed during such inactive or dormant period of membership shall be governed by paragraphs (2), (4), and (5) of Code Section 47-16-40, respectively.

If the removal is occasioned by noncompliance with paragraph (2) of Code Section 47-16-43, upon filing an application for reinstatement to the active membership roll within 12 months from the date of first default and payment of all dues then in default, together with interest on such amounts at 8 percent per annum from the date of such default to the date of payment and such reasonable penalty as may be imposed by the board, the member may be reinstated to the active membership roll and credited for such service. The member may elect to be reinstated to active membership in the fund without credit for prior service, in which case he will not be required to pay dues in default or interest thereon. In such case, he shall receive credit for service from the first day of the term in which his application for reinstatement is submitted to and approved by the board. Application for reinstatement under this subsection shall be accepted by the board only if it is filed by the member between June 1, 1969, and June 30, 1969, or within 30 days following the beginning of his new elective or appointive term.

If the removal is occasioned by noncompliance with paragraph (3) of Code Section 47-16-43, the member may be reinstated to the active roll upon compliance with such reasonable rules and regulations as may be provided by the board.

History.

Ga. L. 1963, p. 630, § 14; Ga. L. 1968, p. 1203, § 9; Ga. L. 1969, p. 586, § 2; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 47.